bg-BG: Включено оборудване за голф: Стъпала за баланс; Държач за топки; Маркер за топка; Четка; Почистващо устройство; Чашка; Кръст за посока; Инструмент за разрохкване; Поддръжка на пръстите; Флаг; GPS навигация; Калъф за топка за голф; Обхват за голф; Захват; Покривало за глава; Табелка с имената; Полиращ тампон; Калъф за пътър; Скууп; Брояч на резултата; Резервна топка; Ключ за шипове; Жало; Тий; Държач за тий; Други
sk-SK: Golfové vybavenie v cene: Balančný pruh; Držiak loptičky; Markovátko; Štetec; Čistič; Pohár; Smerový kríž; Nástroj otáčania; Športová bandáž na prsty; Vlajka; GPS navigácia; Puzdro na golfové loptičky; Golfový ďalekohľad; Grip; Pokrývka hlavy; Menovka; Leštiaci vankúšik; Puzdro na golfový Putter; Naberačka; Počítadlo skóre; Náhradná lopta; Hrotový kľúč; Stinger; Tee; Držiak tee; Iné
fr: Équipement de golf inclus: Bande d’équilibre; Porte-balle; Marqueur de balle; Brosse; Nettoyeur; Tasse; Croix de direction; Relève-pitch; Support pour les doigts; Drapeau; Navigation GPS; Étui pour balle de golf; Portée du golf; Poignée; Couvre-chef; Plaque signalétique; Tampons de polissage; Couverture de putter; Louche; Compteur de points; Balle de rechange; Clé à pointe; Dard; Tee; Accroche canne; Autre
zh-TW: 包括高爾夫裝備: 條紋; 球架; 球標; 畫筆; 清潔劑; 杯型; 十字方向鈕; 果嶺叉; 手指支援; 旗幟; GPS 導航; 高爾夫球盒; 高爾夫測距儀; 握把; 頭套; 銘牌; 擦拭墊; 推桿套; 舀; 計分器; 備用球; 轉釘器; 針刺; 球座; 球座架; 其他
ro-RO: Echipament de golf inclus: Benzi de echilibru; Suport de mingi; Marker pentru mingi; Perie; Agent de curățare; Cupă; Marcaj de direcție; Instrument divot; Suport pentru degete; Steguleț; Navigare GPS; Cutie pentru mingi de golf; Lunetă de golf; Material acoperire capăt crosă; Protecție cap crosă; Plăcuță de identificare; Tampon de lustruit; Capac pentru putter; Recuperator de mingi; Contor de scor; Minge de rezervă; Cheie pentru crampoane; Stinger; Teu; Suport teu; Altele
zh-CN: 包含高尔夫装备: 平衡条; 球架; 球标; 刷子; 清洁设备/清洁剂/去污剂; 杯子; 方向十字; 草皮工具; 手指支撑; 旗帜; GPS 导航; 高尔夫球盒; 高尔夫测距仪; 手柄; 端盖; 铭牌; 抛光垫; 推杆套; 勺子; 计分器; 备用球; 螺丝扳手; 针; 球座; 球座支架; 其他
tr: Golf ekipmanları dahil: Denge şeridi; Top tutucu; Top kalemi; Fırça; Temizleyici; Kap; Çapraz yön; Çukur düzeltme aleti; Parmak desteği; Bayrak; GPS navigasyon; Golf topu vitrini; Golf teleskop; Kabza; Saç bonesi; İsim levhası; Parlatma pedi; Atıcı tamponu; Kepçe; Puan sayacı; Yedek top; Çivili anahtar; Stinger iğne; Golf yuvası; Golf topu tutucu; Diğer
pl: Sprzęt do gry w golfa w zestawie: Pasek wyważający; Uchwyt na piłkę; Znacznik piłki; Pędzel; Substancja do czyszczenia; Kubek; Kierunek poprzeczny; Narzędzie Divot; Wsparcie dla palców; Flaga; Nawigacja GPS; Etui na piłeczki golfowe; Luneta golfowa; Uchwyt; Pokrywa głowicy; Tabliczka znamionowa; Tarcza polerska; Pokrywa puttera; Łyżka; Licznik wyników; Zapasowa kulka; Klucz kolczasty; Żądło; Trójnik; Uchwyt na trójnik; Inne
hr-HR: Uključena oprema za golf: Linija ravnoteže; Držač za lopticu; Označivač loptice; Četka; Sredstvo za čišćenje; Čašica; Oznaka smjera; Alat divot; Potpora za prste; Zastavica; GPS navigacija; Kutija loptice za golf; Ciljnik; Hvat; Pokrivalo za glavu; Pločica s imenom; Jastučić za poliranje; Poklopac puttera; Skupljač loptica; Brojač rezultata; Rezervna loptica; Šiljasti ključ; Stinger; Stalak za lopticu; Držač stalka za lopticu; Ostalo
de: Golfausrüstung inklusive: Balancestreifen; Ballhalter; Ballmarkierer; Bürste; Reiniger; Cup; Richtungskreuz; Pitchgabel; Fingerunterstützung; Flagge; GPS-Navigation; Golfballetui; Golf-Entfernungsmesser; Griff; Kopfbedeckung; Typenschild; Polierkissen; Schlägerhaube; Dosierlöffel; Punktezähler; Ersatzball; Stollenschlüssel; Stinger; Tee; Tee-Halter; Sonstiges
sv: Golfutrustning som ingår: Balansremsa; Kulhållare; Bollmarkör; Borste; Rengöringsmedel; Kopp; Riktningskors; Gräslagare; Fingersupport; Flagga; GPS-navigering; Golfbollfodral; Golfdistansmätare; Grepp; Huvudskydd; Namnskylt; Polerkudde; Putterskydd; Skopa; Poängräknare; Reservboll; Spiknyckel; Stinger; Tee; Tee-hållare; Övrigt
ko: 골프 장비 포함: 밸런스 스트라이프; 볼 홀더; 공 마커; 브러시; 청소기; 컵; 방향 교차; 디봇 툴; 손가락 지지대; 깃발; GPS 내비게이션; 골프공 케이스; 골프 스코프; 그립; 헤드 커버; 명찰; 연마 패드; 퍼터 커버; 국자; 점수 카운터; 예비 공; 스파이크 렌치; 스팅어; 티; 티 홀더; 기타
nb: Golfutstyr inkludert: Balansestripe; Ballholder; Ballmarkører; Børste; Renser; Kopp; Retningskryss; Divotverktøy; Fingerstøtte; Flagg; GPS-navigasjon; Golfballkasse; Golfkikkert; Grep; Hodedekke; Navneskilt; Poleringspute; Putterdeksel; Øse; Poengteller; Reserveball; Piggnøkkel; Stinger; Tee; Tee-holder; Annet
es: Equipo de golf incluido: Cinta de equilibrio; Soporte de pelota; Marcador de pelotas; Pincel; Limpiador; Taza; Cruz de dirección; Herramienta para chuletas; Soporte para los dedos; Bandera; Navegación GPS; Estuche para bolas de golf; Visor de golf; Agarre; Cubierta para la cabeza; Placa de identificación; Almohadilla de pulido; Cubierta para putter; Cuchara; Contador de puntuación; Bola de repuesto; Llave de clavos; Aguijón; Camiseta; Cucharillas; Otros
fi: Mukana golfvarusteet: Tasapainolevy; Palloteline; Pallon merkkausnasta; Sivellin; Puhdistusaine; Kuppi; Suuntaristikko; Greenihaarukka; Sormen tuki; Lippu; GPS-navigointi; Golfpallokotelo; Golfkiikarit; Grippi; Päähine; Nimikyltti; Kiillotustyyny; Puttausmailan suojus; Kauha; Pistelaskuri; Varapallo; Säätöavain; Stinger-uistin; Tii; Tiipidike; Muu
pt-PT: Equipamento de golfe incluído: Extrato bancário; Suporte para bolas; Marcadores de bolas; Pincel; Produto de limpeza; Recipiente; Cruz de direção; Ferramenta para divots; Apoio para os dedos; Bandeira; Navegação por GPS; Estojo para bola de golfe; Escopo de golfe; Punho; Coberturas para a cabeça; Placa de identificação; Esfregão de polimento; Capa para taco; Colher; Contador de pontuação; Bola suplente; Chave de pontas; Ferrão; T-shirt; Suporte para t-shirt; Outro
th: รวมอุปกรณ์กอล์ฟ: แถบรักษาสมดุล; ที่เก็บลูกกอล์ฟ; ที่ทำเครื่องหมายลูก; แปรง; น้ำยาทำความสะอาด; หน้ากากทรง Cup; แท่งกำหนดทิศทาง; ที่ซ่อมกรีน; ผ้ารัดนิ้ว; ธง; ระบบนำทาง GPS; กล่องใส่ลูกกอล์ฟ; กล้องส่องลูกกอล์ฟ; กริปไม้กอล์ฟ; ที่ครอบหัวไม้กอล์ฟ; ป้ายชื่อ; แผ่นขัดเงา; ที่ครอบไม้พัต; ที่ตัก; ตัวนับคะแนน; ลูกสำรอง; ประแจขันปุ่มรองเท้ากอล์ฟ; ปุ่มรองเท้ากอล์ฟ; ที่ตั้งลูก; กระเป๋าเก็บที่ตั้งลูก; อื่นๆ
cs: Obsažené golfové vybavení: Balanční stupínek; Držák míče; Značkovač míčů; Štětec; Čistič; Šálek; Směrový kříž; Vypichovátko; Podpora prstů; Vlajka; GPS navigace; Pouzdro na golfové míčky; Golfový dálkoměr; Uchycení; Pokrývka hlavy; Jmenovka; Lešticí podložka; Kryt na putter; Lopatka; Počítadlo skóre; Náhradní míček; Klíč na hroty; Stinger; Golfové tee; Tee holder; Jiné
da: Golfudstyr medfølger: Balancestribe; Kugleholder; Kuglemarkør; Børste; Renser; Kop; Retningskryds; Pitchfork; Fingersupport; Flag; GPS-navigation; Golfboldtaske; Golfudstyr; Greb; Hoveddæksel; Navneskilt; Pudsepude; Puttercover; Ske; Scoretæller; Reservebold; Pignøgle; Stinger; Tee; Tee-holder; Andet
sl-SI: Priložena oprema za golf: Ravnotežni trak; Držalo za žogo; Označevalec žogice; Čopič; Čistilo; Luknja; Smerni križ; Divot vilice; Podpora za prste; Zastava; GPS navigacija; Ohišje za golf žogico; Daljnogled za golf; Oprijem; Pokrivalo za palico; Imenska ploščica; Polirna blazinica; Pokrivalo za putter; Lovilec žoge; Števec rezultatov; Rezervna žogica; Ključ za žebljičke za čevlje za golf; Stinger; Klinček; Držalo za klinček; Drugo
nl: Golfuitrusting inbegrepen: Balansstreep; Balhouder; Balmarker; Borstel; Schoonmaakmiddel; Kom; Richtingskruis; Pitchfork; Vingerondersteuning; Vlag; GPS-navigatie; Golfbalhouder; Golfbereik; Grip; Hoofddeksel; Naambord; Polijstpad; Putterhoes; Schep; Scoreteller; Reservebal; Spikesleutel; Spijkermat; Tee; Tee-houder; Andere
hu: A tartalmazott golffelszerelés: Egyensúlysáv; Labdatartó; Labdajelző; Kefe; Tisztító; Zászlótartó; Iránykereszt; Javítóeszköz; Ujjtámasz; Zászló; GPS navigáció; Golflabdatok; Golftávcső; Markolat; Fejvédő; Névtábla; Polírozópárna; Puttervédő; Kanál; Pontszámláló; Tartaléklabda; Cipőszög-kulcs; Stinger; Tű; Tűtartó; Egyéb
vi: Bao gồm thiết bị chơi gôn: Sọc cân bằng; Giá đỡ bóng; Mác đánh dấu bóng; Cọ; Máy làm sạch; Cốc; Dấu chữ thấp chỉ hướng; Dụng cụ sửa sân gôn; Nâng đỡ ngón tay; Cờ; Điều hướng GPS; Hộp đựng bóng golf; Ống nhòm chơi gôn; Tay nắm; Bao tóc; Biển tên; Đệm đánh bóng; Bọc gậy putter; Thìa; Bảng tính điểm; Bóng dự phòng; Cờ lê nhọn; Ngòi chích; Cột phát bóng; Giá cài cột phát bóng; Khác
en: Golf equipment included: Balance stripe; Ball holder; Ball marker; Brush; Cleaner; Cup; Direction cross; Divot tool; Finger support; Flag; GPS navigation; Golf ball case; Golf scope; Grip; Head cover; Nameplate; Polishing pad; Putter cover; Scoop; Score counter; Spare ball; Spike wrench; Stinger; Tee; Tee holder; Other
ru: Состав набора инвентаря для гольфа: Балансировочная лента; Держатель мяча; Маркеры для мячей; Щетка; Очиститель; Чашка; Крест направления; Вилка для гольфа; Поддержка пальцев; Флаг; GPS-навигация; Футляр для мячей для гольфа; Прицел для гольфа; Рукоятка; Козырек; Табличка; Полировальная губка; Чехол для паттера; Лопатка; Счетчик очков; Запасной мяч; Ключ-шип; Стингер; Тройник; Держатель тройника; Другое
it: Attrezzatura da golf inclusa: Nastro di equilibrio; Portapalline; Pennarelli per palline; Pennello; Detergente; Coppa; Croce di direzione; Alza pitch; Supporto per le dita; Bandiera; Navigazione GPS; Custodia per palline da golf; Monocolo da golf; Impugnatura; Copricapo; Targhetta con il nome; Tampone per lucidatura; Copri putter; Paletta; Segnapunti; Palla di riserva; Chiave a spillo; Stinger; Tee; Porta tee; Altro
ja: ゴルフ用具付き: バランスストライプ; ボールホルダー; ボールマーカー; ブラシ; クリーナー; カップ; 方向クロス; ディボットツール; フィンガーサポート; フラグ; GPSナビ; ゴルフボールケース; ゴルフスコープ; グリップ; ヘッドカバー; ネームプレート; 研磨パッド; パターカバー; スクープ; スコアカウンター; スペアボール; スパイクレンチ; スティンガー; ティー; ティーホルダー; その他
pt-BR: Equipamento de golfe incluído: Faixa de equilíbrio; Porta-bola; Marcador de bola; Pincel; Limpador; Copo; Cruz de direção; Ferramentas divot; Suporte de dedo; Bandeira; Navegação de GPS; Estojo para bola de golfe; Escopo de golfe; Gancho; Lenço de cabeça; Placa de identificação; Almofadas de polimento; Capa do taco; Colher; Contador de pontuação; Bola reserva; Chave de pontas; Ferrão; Camiseta; Suporte de camiseta; Outro
lt-LT: Į komplektą įtraukta golfo įranga: Pusiausvyros treniravimo juostelė; Kamuoliukų laikiklis; Kamuoliukų žymeklis; Teptukas; Valiklis; Puodelis; Kryptinė rodyklė; Velėnos taisymo įrankis; Piršto atrama; Vėliava; GPS navigacija; Golfo kamuoliukų dėklas; Golfo žiuronai; Rankena; Galvos apdangalas; Vardinė lentelė; Poliravimo trinkelė; Galvutės dangtelis; Mentelė; Rezultatų skaitiklis; Atsarginis kamuoliukas; Smaigalių veržliaraktis; Kontrolinis smūgis; Laikiklis; Laikiklio atrama; Kita
el: Περιλαμβάνεται εξοπλισμός γκολφ: Λωρίδα ισορροπίας; Στήριγμα μπάλας; Σημαιάκι μπάλας; Βούρτσα; Καθαριστής; Κύπελλο; Σταυρός κατεύθυνσης; Εργαλείο αποκατάστασης χλοοτάπητα; Υποστήριξη δακτύλων; Σημαία; Πλοήγηση GPS; Θήκη για μπάλα του γκολφ; Πεδίο γκολφ; Λαβή; Κάλυμμα κεφαλής; Ταμπέλα με όνομα; Μαξιλαράκι γυαλίσματος; Κάλυμμα Putter; Σέσουλα καφέ; Μετρητής βαθμολογίας; Εφεδρική μπάλα; Κλειδί σύσφιγξης για καρφιά παπουτσιών του γκολφ; Καρφί; Πάσσαλος τοποθέτησης μπάλας; Θήκη για πάσσαλο τοποθέτησης μπάλας; Άλλο